Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Citizen Review Panel.

Sec. 47.14.200.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.205.
State Citizen Review Panel.

There is established within the department a Citizen Review Panel. The panel shall be composed of volunteer members who are broadly representative of the state, including members who have expertise in the prevention and treatment of child abuse and neglect.

The panel shall meet not less than once every three months. Meetings may take place telephonically.

History.

(§ 38 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.210.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.215.
Duties of the state panel.

The state panel shall evaluate the extent to which the department is effectively discharging its child protection responsibilities under

the state plan submitted to the United States Department of Health and Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 5106a(b);

child protection standards under federal and state laws; and

any other criteria that the panel considers important to ensuring the protection of children, including the level and efficiency of coordination of foster care and adoption programs in the state and a review of child fatalities and near fatalities.

In carrying out the responsibilities under (a) of this section, the state panel shall examine the policies, procedures, and practices of the department, and, where appropriate, evaluate specific cases of child abuse or neglect.

The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish policies and procedures necessary to carrying out the duties of the state panel under this section.

History.

(§ 39 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.220.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.225.
Cooperation with state panel.

The department shall provide the panel access to information on child abuse or neglect cases that is necessary for the panel to carry out its duties under AS

47.14.215

.

The department shall serve as staff to the state panel as requested by the panel members.

History.

(§ 40 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.230.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.235.
Confidentiality.

A person attending a meeting of the state panel or a member or staff of the state panel may not make any disclosure related to information obtained during a review by the state panel unless authorized under AS

47.10.092

or

47.10.093

.

Meetings of the state panel are subject to AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act).

History.

(§ 41 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(1), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 47.14.240.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.245.
Public outreach.

The state panel shall conduct public outreach and gather public comment on current department procedures and practices involving children and family services.

History.

(§ 42 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.250.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.255.
Report.

The state panel shall prepare and make available to the governor, the legislature, and the public an annual report containing a summary of the activities of the panel conducted under AS

47.14.205

—

47.14.295

and recommendations for the improvement of child protection services in the state.

Not later than six months after the date on which the report is released under (a) of this section, the department shall submit a written response to the report. The department’s response must include a description of whether and how the department will incorporate the recommendations of the panel, where appropriate.

History.

(§ 43 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.260.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.265.
Civil penalty for violation of AS 47.14.235.

A violation under AS

47.14.235

is subject to a civil penalty of up to $2,500 for each violation.

History.

(§ 44 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.270.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.275.
Immunity.

A member of the state panel and a person who furnishes services to or advises the state panel is not liable for damages or other relief in an action involving the performance or failure to perform a duty or other activity of the state panel.

History.

(§ 45 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.14.280.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.14.295.
Definitions.

In AS

47.14.205

—

47.14.295

,

“near fatality” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.990

;

“state panel” means the Citizen Review Panel established under AS

47.14.205

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 82 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor's notes.—

In 2016, paragraphs (2) and (3) were renumbered as paragraphs (1) and (2) to maintain sequential order following the repeal of former paragraph (1) in 2009.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, repealed former (1), which read, “‘adult family member’ has the meaning given in AS

47.10.990

;”.

Sec. 47.14.299.
Citizens’ Foster Care Review Board. [Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]